Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1357
Construction or repair of highways; salvaged materials; transfer to political subdivisions.

The department is authorized to transfer, upon such terms as the department shall prescribe, to any other political or governmental subdivision or public corporation of this state, any materials salvaged and recovered from and through the construction, reconstruction, or repair of a highway if the salvaged materials are not presently needed by the department to carry on its work.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 57, p. 442.